Missouri, session 2026, HB1718.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.610, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 537.610, to read as follows:
537.610. 1. The commissioner of administration, through the purchasing division,
and the governing body of each political subdivision of this state, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, may purchase liability insurance for tort claims, made against the state or the
political subdivision, but the maximum amount of such coverage shall not exceed two million
dollars for all claims arising out of a single occurrence and shall not exceed three hundred
thousand dollars for any one person in a single accident or occurrence, except for those claims
governed by the provisions of the Missouri workers' compensation law, chapter 287, and no
amount in excess of the above limits shall be awarded or settled upon. Sovereign immunity
for the state of Missouri and its political subdivisions is waived only to the maximum amount
of and only for the purposes covered by such policy of insurance purchased pursuant to the
provisions of this section and in such amount and for such purposes provided in any self-
insurance plan duly adopted by the governing body of any political subdivision of the state.
For purposes of this section, the term "purchase" refers only to the direct acquisition by
a governing body of a political subdivision of this state of insurance coverage from an
insurance company or other business entity and does not include any indirect action by
contract or otherwise including, but not limited to, requiring additional insured
coverage or insured status under the insurance policy of another person or entity.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1718 2
2. The liability of the state and its public entities on claims within the scope of
sections 537.600 to 537.650, shall not exceed two million dollars for all claims arising out of
a single accident or occurrence and shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars for any
one person in a single accident or occurrence, except for those claims governed by the
provisions of the Missouri workers' compensation law, chapter 287.
3. No award for damages on any claim against a public entity within the scope of
sections 537.600 to 537.650, shall include punitive or exemplary damages.
4. If the amount awarded to or settled upon multiple claimants exceeds two million
dollars, any party may apply to any circuit court to apportion to each claimant his proper
share of the total amount limited by subsection 1 of this section. The share apportioned each
claimant shall be in the proportion that the ratio of the award or settlement made to him bears
to the aggregate awards and settlements for all claims arising out of the accident or
occurrence, but the share shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars.
5. The limitation on awards for liability provided for in this section shall be increased
or decreased on an annual basis effective January first of each year in accordance with the
Implicit Price Deflator for Personal Consumption Expenditures as published by the Bureau of
Economic Analysis of the United States Department of Commerce. The current value of the
limitation shall be calculated by the director of the department of commerce and insurance,
who shall furnish that value to the secretary of state, who shall publish such value in the
Missouri Register as soon after each January first as practicable, but it shall otherwise be
exempt from the provisions of section 536.021. The applicable limitation on awards for
liability provided for under this section as to a given claim shall be the limitation then in
effect on the date of the accident or occurrence giving rise to the claim.
6. Any claim filed against any public entity under this section shall be subject to the
penalties provided by supreme court rule 55.03, or any successor rule.
✔